Washington statutes.
RCW 25.15.294

Voluntary dissolution—Revocation of dissolution—When effective—Effect.

(1) A limited liability company dissolved under RCW 25.15.265 (2) or (3) may revoke its dissolution in accordance with this section at any time, except that a limited liability company that has filed a certificate of dissolution may not revoke its dissolution under this section more than one hundred twenty days after the filing of its certificate of dissolution.

(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, revocation of dissolution must be approved in the same manner as the dissolution was approved unless that approval permitted revocation in some other manner, in which event the dissolution may be revoked in the manner permitted.

(b) If dissolution occurred upon the happening of events specified in the limited liability company agreement, revocation of dissolution must be approved in the manner necessary to amend the provisions of the limited liability company agreement specifying the events of dissolution.

(3) A limited liability company that has filed a certificate of dissolution may, at any time after revocation of its dissolution has been approved but not more than one hundred twenty days after the filing of its certificate of dissolution, revoke the dissolution by delivering to the secretary of state for filing a certificate of revocation of dissolution that sets forth:

(a) The name of the limited liability company and a statement that the name satisfies the requirements of Article 3 of chapter 23.95 RCW; if the name is not available, the limited liability company must deliver to the secretary of state for filing a certificate of amendment changing its name with the certificate of revocation of dissolution;

(b) The effective date of the dissolution that was revoked;

(c) The date that the revocation of dissolution was approved; and

(d) A statement that the revocation was approved in the manner required by subsection (2) of this section.

(4) If a limited liability company has not filed a certificate of dissolution, revocation of dissolution becomes effective upon approval of the revocation as provided in subsection (2) of this section. If a limited liability company has filed a certificate of dissolution, revocation of dissolution becomes effective upon the filing of a certificate of revocation of dissolution. The filing of a certificate of revocation of dissolution automatically revokes any certificate of dissolution previously filed with respect to the limited liability company.

(5) Revocation of dissolution relates back to and takes effect as of the effective date of the dissolution and the limited liability company may resume carrying on its activities as if the dissolution had never occurred.

[ 2015 c 176 s 7116; 2015 c 188 s 57.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.